Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-617.11
Delayed birth certificate; hearing; findings; order; contents.

If the court finds from the evidence presented that the person for whom a delayed certificate of birth is sought was born in this state, it shall make findings as to the place and date of birth, parentage, and such other findings as the case may require and shall issue an order on a form prescribed and furnished by the department to establish a certificate of birth. The order shall include the birth data to be registered, a description of the evidence presented, and the date of the court's action.

Laws 1985, LB 42, § 18;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 150;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 425.